Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 294.630 is amended to read:
294.630. (1) There hereby is created an account to be known as  the tax supervising and con-
servation commission account in the general fund  of each county subject to ORS 294.605 to 294.705.
(2)(a) On or before April 1 of  each year,  the tax supervising and conservation commission
shall [ on or before April 1  of each year ] submit certified budgets for the ensuing fiscal year to the
county court or board of  county commissioners. The budget shall contain a complete and detailed
estimate of the proposed expenditures of the commission for all purposes.
(b) Following the receipt of the budget, the county court or board  of county commissioners shall
include the budget as submitted as a part of the  county budget and shall make an appropriation for
the tax supervising and conservation commission account sufficient to cover the proposed  expendi-
tures, but  no appropriation shall be made in any county in any year for such purpose in excess of
[$280,000] $410,000. The  maximum amount of the appropriation shall be increased by [ three] four
percent each fiscal year, beginning with the fiscal year starting July 1, [ 2011] 2019. The county court
or board of county commissioners shall not reduce the amount of the  budget as presented by the tax
supervising and conservation commission, within the amount stated in this section, nor shall  it re-
fuse to approve any lawful  request for disbursement of money from the tax supervising and conser-
vation commission account.
(3)(a) The tax supervising and conservation commission may:
(A) Charge for services provided by the commission to any  municipal corporation that is
not subject to the commission’s jurisdiction under ORS 294.625; and
(B) Apply for and receive grants.
(b) Any moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall:
(A) Be credited to  the tax supervising and conservation commission account created
under this section;
(B) Be continuously appropriated to the  commission for the performance of duties and
for the exercise of authority assigned to the commission under ORS 294.605 to 294.705; and
(C) Supplement, not supplant, the appropriation for the commission account made pur-
suant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2504 (HB 2504-INTRO) Page 1
(c) Costs incurred by the commission pursuant  to paragraph (a) of this subsection may
not be charged to municipal corporations subject to  the commission’s jurisdiction under ORS
294.625.
SECTION 2.  ORS 294.632 is amended to read:
294.632. (1) Not later than August 30 of each year, the tax  supervising and conservation com-
mission shall calculate the net cost of commission operations for the  preceding fiscal year. The
calculation shall include:
(a) Actual expenditures paid out of the tax supervising and conservation  commission account
established in ORS 294.630 , other than expenditures of funds described in ORS 294.630 (3) ;
(b) A provision for the cost to the county of providing office space for use by the  commission,
as required by ORS 294.620; and
(c) A deduction for an  estimate of the amount received by the county under ORS 294.175 to
294.187 attributable to  the expenditures in the grant submitted by the county for activities, functions
or services of the tax supervising and conservation commission.
(2) Municipal corporations, other than the county, that are within the county and that are sub-
ject to the jurisdiction of a tax supervising and conservation commission shall reimburse the county
50 percent of the net costs calculated under  subsection (1) of this section. The amounts allocable to
each municipal corporation required to reimburse the  county under this subsection shall be deter-
mined as follows:
(a)(A) Fifty percent of the amount allocated shall be based on  the taxes imposed for the pre-
ceding fiscal year  for taxes certified to the county assessor under ORS 310.060 (2)(a) from the per-
manent rate limitations of the municipal corporations after reductions necessary to comply with
Article XI,  section 11b, [ Article XI ] of  the Oregon Constitution, and funds raised pursuant to the
notice provided to the county assessor under ORS 457.440 (2)  for an urban renewal agency located
in a municipal corporation subject to this subsection.
(B) The amount allocated under this paragraph shall be prorated based on each  municipal
corporation’s share of  the total tax imposed from the permanent rate limitation of municipal corpo-
rations that are subject to the jurisdiction of the tax supervising and conservation commission.
(C) A minimum amount of  $250 shall be allocated to any municipal corporation under this par-
agraph.
(D) Municipal corporations that  do not levy ad valorem taxes are exempt from proration under
this paragraph.
(b)(A) Fifty percent of the amount allocated shall be based on the expenditures,  as defined in
ORS 294.311, for the current fiscal year for each municipal corporation required to  reimburse the
county under this subsection.
(B) The amount allocated under this paragraph shall be prorated based on each  municipal
corporation’s share of the total expenditures for those municipal corporations that are  under the
jurisdiction of the tax supervising and conservation commission.
(C) A minimum amount of  $250 shall be allocated to any municipal corporation under this par-
agraph.
(D) Municipal corporations with budgeted expenditures of $50,000 or  less and urban renewal
agencies formed under ORS chapter 457 are exempt from proration under this paragraph.
(E) If a municipal corporation has adopted a biennial budget, the calculation of  the proration
under this paragraph shall use fiscal year expenditures. If the budget document adopted by the mu-
nicipal corporation does not indicate fiscal year  expenditures, then 45 percent of the biennial ex-
penditures shall be used for the proration in the first fiscal year of the  municipal corporation’s
budget period and 55 percent  of the biennial expenditures shall be used for the proration in the
second year of the budget period.
(3) Not later than  August 30 of each fiscal year, the tax supervising and conservation commis-
sion shall distribute to each municipal  corporation an accounting of the calculations under this
section showing:
(a) The net costs under subsection (1) of this section;
Enrolled House Bill 2504 (HB 2504-INTRO) Page 2
(b) The 50 percent of  net costs allocable to municipal corporations, except the county, under
subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) The amounts prorated to each municipal corporation under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Not later than September 15 of each fiscal year, the tax supervising and  conservation com-
mission shall send to the county tax  collector, or other county official responsible for preparing the
percentage schedule under ORS 311.390, a list of municipal corporations subject to  proration under
this section and the amounts prorated under this section.
(5) If a municipal corporation subject to proration under this section does not certify a  property
tax to the  county assessor under ORS 310.060, the county shall, not later than November 30 of each
year, send  the municipal corporation a billing for the amount prorated and owed to the county under
this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 22, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2504 (HB 2504-INTRO) Page 3